District of Columbia statutes.
47-373

Organization of fund structure.

Effective October 1, 1979, for purposes of accounting and financial reporting the District of Columbia shall utilize a fund structure organized into the following fund categories, fund types, and account groups:

(1)

Fund categories. —

All funds of the District of Columbia shall be classified and maintained by the Mayor into 1 of the following 3 categories:

(A)

Governmental funds. —

These funds shall be composed of accounts for the acquisition, use, and balance of the District’s expendable financial resources and the related current liabilities except those funds accounted for in proprietary funds. The governmental fund category shall include the following fund types:

(i)

General;

(ii)

Capital projects; and

(iii)

Debt service;

(B)

Proprietary funds. —

These funds shall be composed of activities which are intended to be monitored in a manner similar to those found in the private sector. The assets, liabilities, equities, revenues, expenses, and transfers shall be separately accounted for in such fund and be maintained separately from the General Fund of the District of Columbia in accordance with the legal requirements applicable to such fund or in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles applicable to such funds. The following fund types shall be considered proprietary funds:

(i)

Enterprise funds;

(ii)

Municipal University Fund;

(iii)

Internal services funds;

(iv)

Hospital Fund;

(v)

Material fund;

(vi)

Antitrust fund; and

(vii)

Tenant Assistance Program;

(C)

Fiduciary funds. —

These funds shall consist of assets held by the District of Columbia in a trustee capacity or as an agent for individuals, private organizations, other governmental units or for similar types of purposes. This category shall include the following fund types:

(i)

Trust funds; and

(ii)

Agency funds.

(2)

Fund types. —

The Mayor shall maintain 9 fund types within the fund categories established in paragraph (1) of this section as follows:

(A)

General Fund to account for all financial resources except those required to be accounted for in another fund;

(B)

Capital projects funds to account for financial resources used for the acquisition or construction of major capital facilities other than those financed by proprietary or fiduciary funds;

(C)

Debt service funds to account for the accumulation of resources for, and the payment of, interest and principal on general long-term debt;

(D)

Enterprise funds to account for operations that are financed and operated in a manner similar to private business enterprises; or where it has been determined that periodic determination of revenues earned, expenses incurred, and/or net income is appropriate for capital maintenance public policy, management control, accountability, or other purposes;

(E)

Internal service funds to account for the financing of goods or services provided by the fund to other departments, agencies or funds of the District, or to other governmental units, on a cost-reimbursement or fee for services basis;

(F)

Municipal University Fund to account for the functions and activities of the University of the District of Columbia and its constituent funds;

(G)

Hospital Fund to account for the function and activities of the D.C. General Hospital;

(H)

Trust funds to account for assets held by the District in a trustee capacity or as an agent for individuals, private organizations, other government units, and/or other funds of a similar nature;

(I)

Agency funds to account for assets held by the District in a custodial capacity as an agent for individuals, private organizations, other government units, and/or funds of a similar nature; and

(J)

Antitrust fund to account for the investigation, preparation, institution, and maintenance of antitrust actions by the District of Columbia government.

(3)

Account groups. —

The Mayor shall maintain 2 account groups, the general fixed asset group of accounts and the general long-term debt group of accounts, to establish account control and accountability for the District’s general fixed assets not accounted for in a specific fund and the unmatured principal of its general obligation long-term debt and any other non-current liabilities of the District not accounted for in a specific fund:

(A)

The general fixed asset group of accounts shall be used to record the District’s capitalized general fixed assets which are not recorded in proprietary or fiduciary funds. Fixed assets related to specific proprietary funds or fiduciary funds will be accounted for through those funds; and

(B)

The general long-term debt group of accounts shall be used to record the unmatured principal of general obligations long-term debt and any other non-current general long-term liabilities which are not recorded in another proprietary or fiduciary fund. Non-current liabilities of proprietary funds and fiduciary funds will be accounted for through those funds.

June 14, 1980, D.C. Law 3-70, § 4, 27 DCR 1776
Aug. 22, 1980, D.C. Law 3-82, § 4, 27 DCR 2647
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-169, § 3(b), 27 DCR 5368
Oct. 2, 1987, D.C. Law 7-30, § 6, 34 DCR 5304
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Driver education program, trust fund, see § 50-1405.01.
Eastern market enterprise fund, see § 37-103.
License law, establishment of basic business license fund, see § 47-2851.13.
Recorder of deeds, automation and infrastructure improvement fund, see § 42-1214.
Sale of public lands, expenses and proceeds of sale, board of education real property improvement and maintenance fund, see §
This section is referenced in § 2-1210.02, § 6-202, § 7-733, § 7-733.02, § 8-2131.07, § 29-102.13, § 37-103, § 42-1214, § 44-234, § 44-420.01, § 47-372, and § 47-2851.13.
1981 Ed., § 47-373.
Restriction on moneys borrowed for capital projects: Section 120 of Pub. L. 101-168, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1990, provided that the Mayor shall not expend any moneys borrowed for capital projects for the operating expenses of the District of Columbia government.